Ohio, session 136, SB335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1.14, 5.20, 124.19, 325.19, 511.10, 1345.21, 3313.63, and 3319.087 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 1.14. The time within which an act is required by law to be done shall be computed by excluding the first and including the last day; except that, when the last day falls on Sunday or a legal holiday, the act may be done on the next succeeding day that is not Sunday or a legal holiday. When a public office in which an act, required by law, is to be performed is closed to the public for the entire day that constitutes the last day for doing the act or before its usual closing time on that day, the act may be performed on the next succeeding day that is not a Sunday or a legal holiday as defined in this section. "Legal holiday" as used in this section means the following days: (A) The first day of January, known as New Year's day; (B) The third Monday in January, known as Martin Luther King day; (C) The third Monday in February, known as Washington-Lincoln day; (D) The day designated in the "Act of June 28, 1968," 82 Stat. 250, 5 U.S.C. 6103, as amended, for the commemoration of Memorial day; (E) The nineteenth day of June, known as Juneteenth day; (F) The fourth day of July, known as Independence day; (G) The first Monday in September, known as Labor day; (H) The second Monday in October, known as Columbus day; (I) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, known as Democracy day; (J) The eleventh day of November, known as Veterans' day; (J) (K) The fourth Thursday in November, known as Thanksgiving day; (K) (L) The twenty-fifth day of December, known as Christmas day; (L) (M) Any day appointed and recommended by the governor of this state or the president of the United States as a holiday. If any day designated in this section as a legal holiday falls on Sunday, the next succeeding day is a legal holiday. Sec. 5.20. The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each year, between the hours of twelve noon, eastern standard time, and five-thirty p.m., eastern standard time, is a legal holiday. Sec. 124.19. (A) State holidays shall be the first day of January, the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, the day designated in the "Act of June 28, 1968," 82 Stat. 250, 5 U.S.C. 6103, as amended, for the commemoration of Memorial day, the nineteenth day of June, the fourth day of July, the first Monday in September, the second Monday in October, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, the eleventh day of November, the fourth Thursday in November, the twenty-fifth day of December, and any day appointed and recommended by the governor of this state or the president of the United States. Employees shall be paid for these holidays as specified in section 124.18 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of trustees of a community college, technical college, state community college, or state university or college as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code may, for all employees of the college or university, observe on days other than those specified in division (A) of this section any of the holidays otherwise observed on the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, and the second Monday in October. Sec. 325.19. (A)(1) The granting of vacation leave under division (A)(1) of this section is subject to divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section. Each full-time employee in the several offices and departments of the county service, including full-time hourly rate employees, after service of one year with the county or any political subdivision of the state, shall have earned and will be due upon the attainment of the first year of employment, and annually thereafter, eighty hours of vacation leave with full pay. One year of service shall be computed on the basis of twenty-six biweekly pay periods. A full-time county employee with eight or more years of service with the county or any political subdivision of the state shall have earned and is entitled to one hundred twenty hours of vacation leave with full pay. A full-time county employee with fifteen or more years of service with the county or any political subdivision of the state shall have earned and is entitled to one hundred sixty hours of vacation leave with full pay. A full-time county employee with twenty-five years of service with the county or any political subdivision of the state shall have earned and is entitled to two hundred hours of vacation leave with full pay. Such vacation leave shall accrue to the employee at the rate of three and one-tenth hours each biweekly period for those entitled to eighty hours per year; four and six-tenths hours each biweekly period for those entitled to one hundred twenty hours per year; six and two-tenths hours each biweekly period for those entitled to one hundred sixty hours per year; and seven and seven-tenths hours each biweekly period for those entitled to two hundred hours per year. The appointing authorities of the offices and departments of the county service may permit all or any part of a person's prior service with any regional council of government established in accordance with Chapter 167. of the Revised Code to be considered service with the county or a political subdivision of the state for the purpose of determining years of service under this division. (2) Full-time employees granted vacation leave under division (A)(1) of this section who render any standard of service other than forty hours per week as described in division (K) of this section and who are in active pay status in a biweekly pay period, shall accrue a number of hours of vacation leave during each such pay period that bears the same ratio to the number of hours specified in division (A)(1) of this section as their number of hours which are accepted as full-time in active pay status, excluding overtime hours, bears to eighty hours. (3) Full-time employees granted vacation leave under division (A)(1) of this section who are in active pay status in a biweekly pay period for less than eighty hours or the number of hours of service otherwise accepted as full-time by their employing office or department shall accrue a number of hours of vacation leave during that pay period that bears the same ratio to the number of hours specified in division (A)(1) of this section as their number of hours in active pay status, excluding overtime hours, bears to eighty or the number of hours of service accepted as full-time, whichever is applicable. (B) A board of county commissioners, by resolution, may grant vacation leave with full pay to part-time county employees. A part-time county employee shall be eligible for vacation leave with full pay upon the attainment of the first year of employment, and annually thereafter. The ratio between the hours worked and the vacation hours awarded to a part-time employee shall be the same as the ratio between the hours worked and the vacation hours earned by a full-time employee as provided for in this section. (C) Days specified as holidays in section 124.19 of the Revised Code shall not be charged to an employee's vacation leave. Vacation leave shall be taken by the employee during the year in which it accrued and prior to the next recurrence of the anniversary date of the employee's employment, provided that the appointing authority may, in special and meritorious cases, permit such employee to accumulate and carry over the employee's vacation leave to the following year. No vacation leave shall be carried over for more than three years. An employee is entitled to compensation, at the employee's current rate of pay, for the prorated portion of any earned but unused vacation leave for the current year to the employee's credit at time of separation, and in addition shall be compensated for any unused vacation leave accrued to the employee's credit, with the permission of the appointing authority, for the three years immediately preceding the last anniversary date of employment. (D)(1) In addition to vacation leave, a full-time county employee is entitled to eight hours of holiday pay for New Year's day, Martin Luther King day, Washington-Lincoln day, Memorial day, Juneteenth day, Independence day, Labor day, Columbus day, Democracy day, Veterans' day, Thanksgiving day, and Christmas day, of each year. Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, holidays shall occur on the days specified in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. If any of those holidays fall on Saturday, the Friday immediately preceding shall be observed as the holiday. If any of those holidays fall on Sunday, the Monday immediately succeeding shall be observed as the holiday. If an employee's work schedule is other than Monday through Friday, the employee is entitled to holiday pay for holidays observed on the employee's day off regardless of the day of the week on which they are observed. (2)(a) When a classified employee of a county board of developmental disabilities works at a site maintained by a government entity other than the board, such as a public school, the board may adjust the employee's holiday schedule to conform to the schedule adopted by the government entity. Under an adjusted holiday schedule, an employee shall receive the number of hours of holiday pay granted under division (D)(1) of this section. (b) Pursuant to division (J)(6) of section 339.06 of the Revised Code, a county hospital may observe Martin Luther King day, Washington-Lincoln day, Columbus day, and Veterans' day on days other than those specified in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (E) In the case of the death of a county employee, the unused vacation leave and unpaid overtime to the credit of the employee shall be paid in accordance with section 2113.04 of the Revised Code, or to the employee's estate. (F) Notwithstanding this section or any other section of the Revised Code, any appointing authority of a county office, department, commission, board, or body may, upon notification to the board of county commissioners, establish alternative schedules of vacation leave and holidays for employees of the appointing authority for whom the state employment relations board has not established an appropriate bargaining unit pursuant to section 4117.06 of the Revised Code, as long as the alternative schedules are not inconsistent with the provisions of at least one collective bargaining agreement covering other employees of that appointing authority, if such an agreement exists. If no such collective bargaining agreement exists, an appointing authority, upon notification to the board of county commissioners, may establish an alternative schedule of vacation leave and holidays for its employees that does not diminish the vacation leave and holiday benefits granted by this section. (G) The employees of a county children services board that establishes vacation benefits under section 5153.12 of the Revised Code are exempt from division (A) of this section. (H) The provisions of this section do not apply to superintendents and management employees of county boards of developmental disabilities. (I) Division (A) of this section does not apply to an employee of a county board of developmental disabilities who works at, or provides transportation services to pupils of, a special education program provided by the county board pursuant to division (A)(4) of section 5126.05 of the Revised Code, if the employee's employment is based on a school year and the employee is not subject to a contract with the county board that provides for division (A) of this section to apply to the employee. (J) Notwithstanding division (C) of this section or any other section of the Revised Code, if a separation from county service occurs in connection with the lease, sale, or other transfer of all or substantially all the business and assets of a county hospital organized under Chapter 339. of the Revised Code to a private corporation or other entity, the appointing authority shall have no obligation to pay any compensation with respect to unused vacation leave accrued to the credit of an employee who accepts employment with the acquiring corporation or other entity, if at the effective time of separation the acquiring corporation or other entity expressly assumes such unused vacation leave accrued to the employee's credit. (K) As used in this section: (1) "Full-time employee" means an employee whose regular hours of service for a county total forty hours per week, or who renders any other standard of service accepted as full-time by an office, department, or agency of county service. (2) "Part-time employee" means an employee whose regular hours of service for a county total less than forty hours per week, or who renders any other standard of service accepted as part-time by an office, department, or agency of county service, and whose hours of county service total at least five hundred twenty hours annually. (3) "Management employee" has the same meaning as in section 5126.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 511.10. The board of township trustees may appoint such superintendents, architects, clerks, laborers, and other employees as are necessary and fix their compensation. Any person so appointed may be removed by a majority of the members of such board at any time. Any township employee working on a salary or hourly basis is entitled to eight hours of holiday pay for New Year's day, Martin Luther King day, Washington-Lincoln day, Memorial day, Juneteenth day, Independence day, Labor day, Columbus day, Democracy day, Veterans' day, Thanksgiving day, and Christmas day, of each year, provided that the employee is a regular employee with at least six months full-time township service prior to the month when such holiday occurs. Holidays shall occur on the days specified in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. The board of township trustees may purchase or lease uniforms for laborers or other employees engaged in the maintenance of township property. Sec. 1345.21. As used in sections 1345.21 to 1345.28 of the Revised Code: (A) "Home solicitation sale" means a sale of consumer goods or services in which the seller or a person acting for the seller engages in a personal solicitation of the sale at a residence of the buyer, including solicitations in response to or following an invitation by the buyer, and the buyer's agreement or offer to purchase is there given to the seller or a person acting for the seller, or in which the buyer's agreement or offer to purchase is made at a place other than the seller's place of business. It does not include a transaction or transactions in which: (1) The total purchase price to be paid by the buyer, whether under single or multiple contracts, is less than twenty-five dollars; (2) The transaction was conducted and consummated entirely by mail or by telephone if initiated by the buyer, and without any other contact between the seller or the seller's representative prior to the delivery of goods or performance of the service; (3) The final agreement is made pursuant to prior negotiations in the course of a visit by the buyer to a retail business establishment having a fixed permanent location where the goods are exhibited or the services are offered for sale on a continuing basis; (4) The buyer initiates the contact between the parties for the purpose of negotiating a purchase and the seller has a business establishment at a fixed location in this state where the goods or services involved in the transaction are regularly offered or exhibited for sale. Advertisements by such a seller in newspapers, magazines, catalogues, radio, or television do not constitute the seller initiation of the contact. (5) The buyer initiates the contact between the parties, the goods or services are needed to meet a bona fide immediate personal emergency of the buyer which will jeopardize the welfare, health, or safety of natural persons, or endanger property which the buyer owns or for which the buyer is responsible, and the buyer furnishes the seller with a separate, dated, and signed statement in the buyer's handwriting describing the situation requiring immediate remedy and expressly acknowledging and waiving the right to cancel the sale within three business days; (6) The buyer has initiated the contact between the parties and specifically requested the seller to visit the buyer's home for the purpose of repairing or performing maintenance upon the buyer's personal property. If, in the course of such a visit, the seller sells the buyer additional services or goods other than replacement parts necessarily used in performing the maintenance or in making the repairs, the sale of those additional goods or services does not fall within this exclusion. (7) The buyer is accorded the right of rescission by the "Consumer Credit Protection Act," (1968) 82 Stat. 152, 15 U.S.C. 1635, or regulations adopted pursuant to it. (B) "Sale" includes a lease or rental. (C) "Seller" includes a lessor or anyone offering goods for rent. (D) "Buyer" includes a lessee or anyone who gives a consideration for the privilege of using goods. (E) "Consumer goods or services" means goods or services purchased, leased, or rented primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, including courses or instruction or training regardless of the purpose for which they are taken. (F) "Consumer goods or services" does not include goods or services pertaining to any of the following: (1) Sales or rentals of real property by a real estate broker or salesperson, or by a foreign real estate dealer or salesperson, who is licensed by the Ohio real estate commission under Chapter 4735. of the Revised Code; (2) The sale of securities or commodities by a broker-dealer registered with the securities and exchange commission; (3) The sale of securities or commodities by a securities dealer or salesperson licensed by the division of securities under Chapter 1707. of the Revised Code; (4) The sale of insurance by a person licensed by the superintendent of insurance; (5) Goods sold or services provided by automobile dealers and salespersons licensed by the registrar of motor vehicles under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code; (6) The sale of property at an auction by an auctioneer licensed by the department of agriculture under Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code. (G) "Purchase price" means the total cumulative price of the consumer goods or services, including all interest and service charges. (H) "Place of business" means the main office, or a permanent branch office or permanent local address of a seller. (I) "Business day" means any calendar day except Sunday, or the following business holidays: New Year's day, Martin Luther King day, Presidents' day, Memorial day, Juneteenth day, Independence day, Labor day, Columbus day, Democracy day, Veterans day, Thanksgiving day, and Christmas day. Sec. 3313.63. Boards of education may dismiss the schools under their control on the first day of January, the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, the day designated in the "Act of June 28, 1968," 82 Stat. 250, 5 U.S.C. 6103, as amended, for the commemoration of Memorial day, the nineteenth day of June, the fourth day of July, the first Monday in September, the second Monday in October, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November, the eleventh day of November, or the succeeding Monday when that day falls on a Sunday, the fourth Thursday in November, and the twenty-fifth day of December, on any day set apart by proclamation of the president of the United States or the governor of this state as a day of fast, thanksgiving, or mourning, or on the days approved by the board for teachers' attendance at an educational meeting. Sec. 3319.087. Notwithstanding section 3319.086 of the Revised Code, all regular nonteaching school employees employed on an eleven or twelve month basis, whether salaried or compensated on an hourly or per diem basis, are entitled to a minimum of the following holidays for which they shall be paid their regular salary or their regular rate of pay, provided each such employee accrued earnings on the employee's next preceding and next following scheduled work days before and after such holiday or was properly excused from attendance at work on either or both of those days: New Year's day, Martin Luther King day, Memorial day, Juneteenth day, Independence day, Labor day, Democracy day, Thanksgiving day, and Christmas day of each year. All regular nonteaching school employees employed on a nine or ten month basis, whether salaried or compensated on an hourly or per diem basis, are entitled to a minimum of the following holidays for which they shall be paid their regular salary or their regular rate of pay, provided each such employee accrued earnings on the employee's next preceding and next following scheduled work days before and after such holiday or was properly excused from attendance at work on either or both of those days: New Year's day, Martin Luther King day, Memorial day, Labor day, Democracy day, Thanksgiving day, and Christmas day of each year. Regular nonteaching school employees employed less than nine months shall be entitled to a minimum of those holidays enumerated in this section which fall during the employees' time of employment. In addition to the above named holidays, a board of education may declare any other day, except days approved for teachers' attendance at an educational meeting, as a holiday and shall pay to all such regular nonteaching school employees, whether salaried or compensated on an hourly or per diem basis, their regular salary or their regular rate of pay. When any employee is required by the employee's responsible administrative superior to work on any of the paid holidays, the employee shall be granted compensatory time off for which the employee shall be paid the employee's regular salary or regular rate of pay, or a board of education may establish a premium rate of pay for work performed on a paid holiday. Holidays shall occur on the days specified in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. For purposes of determining whether a person who is not in the employ of a board of education on Labor day is in compliance with the requirement of this section that states that in order for a nonteaching employee to be eligible for Labor day holiday pay the employee must have accrued earnings on the scheduled work day immediately preceding Labor day or have been excused from attendance at work on that day, a board of education shall count the employee's last scheduled work day of the employee's preceding period of employment as the employee's last scheduled day of employment for purposes of this requirement. For the purposes of this section, "employed" and "time of employment" mean the period from the initial date of employment to the termination of employment with that school district. Section 2. That existing sections 1.14, 5.20, 124.19, 325.19, 511.10, 1345.21, 3313.63, and 3319.087 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.